Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.480

Deposits in court—Order.

When it is admitted by the pleading or examination of a party, that the party possesses or has control of any money, or other thing capable of delivery, which being the subject of the litigation, is held by him or her as trustee for another party, or which belongs or is due to another party, the court may order the same to be deposited in court, or delivered to such party, with or without security, subject to the further direction of the court.

[ 2003 c 406 s 27; Code 1881 s 195; 1877 p 41 s 199; 1869 p 49 s 203; 1854 p 163 s 174; RRS s 745.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 67.